Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1146.
do enact as follows:AB1146,11Section 1. 50.374 of the statutes is created to read:AB1146,2,3250.374 Hospital nurse staffing requirements. (1) Definitions. In this 3section:AB1146,3,31(a) “Direct patient care” means any direct patient contact or treatment, 2including consultation, diagnostic tests and procedures, therapeutic procedures, 3pathological analyses and reports, and any other direct medical or health services.AB1146,3,54(b) “Nurse staffing plan” means a plan developed and provided to the 5department under sub. (2) (a).AB1146,3,66(c) “Registered nurse” has the meaning given in s. 146.40 (1) (f).AB1146,3,97(2) Safe nurse staffing standards; nurse staffing plan. (a) A hospital 8shall provide to the department, by a date determined by the department, a nurse 9staffing plan for the upcoming year.AB1146,3,1210(b) A hospital shall, in its nurse staffing plan, provide for a collaborative 11practice in the hospital that enhances patient care and the level of services provided 12by nurses and other members of the hospital’s patient care team.AB1146,3,1313(c) A hospital shall include all of the following in its nurse staffing plan:AB1146,3,16141. A written certification that the nurse staffing plan is sufficient to provide 15adequate and appropriate delivery of health care services to patients during the 16year.AB1146,3,18172. The hospital’s employment practices concerning the use of temporary and 18traveling nurses.AB1146,3,19193. The hospital’s process for internal review of the nurse staffing plan.AB1146,3,22204. The hospital’s mechanism for obtaining input from staff that provide direct 21patient care, including registered nurses and other members of the hospital’s 22patient care team, in the development of the nurse staffing plan.AB1146,4,215. The minimum registered nurse skill mix for each patient care unit in the 2hospital, including inpatient, critical care, and emergency department staffing.AB1146,4,436. The method used by the hospital to determine and adjust direct patient 4care nurse staffing levels.AB1146,4,657. The supporting personnel assisting on each patient care unit of the 6hospital.AB1146,4,878. The number of registered nurses providing direct patient care and the ratio 8of registered nurses to patients in each care unit of the hospital.AB1146,4,119(d) A hospital shall provide in its nurse staffing plan that, at all times during 10each shift within a hospital unit, a registered nurse providing direct patient care is 11assigned to not more than the following number of patients in that hospital unit:AB1146,4,12121. Four patients in an emergency unit.AB1146,4,13132. Two patients in an intensive care emergency unit.AB1146,4,14143. Two trauma patients in a trauma emergency unit.AB1146,4,15154. Two patients in an intensive care unit.AB1146,4,16165. Three patients in a progressive care unit.AB1146,4,17176. Four patients in a telemetry unit.AB1146,4,18187. Five patients in a medical-surgical unit.AB1146,4,19198. Four patients in a pediatric unit.AB1146,4,20209. One patient in an operating room unit.AB1146,4,212110. Two patients in a postanesthesia care unit.AB1146,4,222211. Five patients in an oncology unit.AB1146,4,232312. Five patients in an orthopedic unit.AB1146,5,1113. Six patients in a psychiatry unit.AB1146,5,2214. Four patients in a labor obstetrics unit.AB1146,5,3315. Four patients in a postpartum obstetrics unit.AB1146,5,4416. Four patients in a nursery obstetrics unit.AB1146,5,5517. Two patients in a neonatal intensive care unit.AB1146,5,76(e) A hospital’s nurse staffing plan shall be approved by a majority vote of the 7members of the hospital’s nurse staffing committee under sub. (3).AB1146,5,98(f) A hospital, in collaboration with its nurse staffing committee, shall 9implement to the best of its ability the nurse staffing plan.AB1146,5,1510(g) If staffing falls below the levels proposed in the nurse staffing plan for the 11previous reporting period, a hospital shall include, in its nurse staffing plan for the 12subsequent reporting period, a description of any differences between the staffing 13levels described in the previous staffing plan and the actual staffing levels for each 14patient care unit and any actions the hospital intends to take to address the 15differences or adjust staffing levels in future staffing plans.AB1146,5,1816(h) A hospital shall post its nurse staffing plan on each unit of the hospital in 17a location that is visible, conspicuous, and accessible to staff, patients, and the 18public.AB1146,5,2019(i) The department shall post each hospital’s nurse staffing plan on the 20department’s website. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1146 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1146 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1146 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1146 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1146: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting